ja: 電動ワインダーアクセサリー付き: ACアダプター/電源; ボビンアダプター; コーンホルダー; フットペダル; スプールピンアダプター; テーブルクランプ; 糸ガイド; USBケーブル; その他
es: Accesorios para el bobinador eléctrico incluidos: Adaptador de CA/fuente de alimentación; Adaptador(es) de bobina; Soporte para conos; Pedal; Adaptador(es) de portacarretes; Abrazadera de mesa; Guía de hilo; Cable USB; Otro
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за електрическа машина за навиване.: AC адаптер/захранващ блок; Адаптер(и) за калерче; Поставка за конус; Крачен педал; Адаптер(и) за щифт за макара; Скоба за маса; Водач за конец; USB кабел; Други
sv: Tillbehör för elektrisk lindningsmaskin som ingår: Nätadapter/strömförsörjning; Spoladaptrar; Konhållare; Fotpedal; Spolstiftsadaptrar; Bordsklämma; Trådguide; USB-kabel; Övrigt
en: Electric winder accessories included: AC adapter/power supply; Bobbin adapter(s); Cone holder; Foot pedal; Spool pin adapter(s); Table clamp; Thread guide; USB cable; Other
tr: Elektrikli sarma makinesi aksesuarları dahildir: AC adaptörü/güç kaynağı; Masura adaptör(ler)i; Koni tutucu; Ayak pedalı; Makara pimi adaptör(ler)i; Masa mandalı; İplik kılavuzu; USB kablosu; Diğer
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru bobinatorul electric: Adaptor c.a./sursă de alimentare; Adaptor(oare) pentru bobină; Suport pentru con; Pedală; Adaptor(oare) ax mosorel; Clemă de prindere pentru masă; Ghidaj pentru fir; Cablu USB; Altele
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่มาพร้อมกับเครื่องพันแบบไฟฟ้า: อะแดปเตอร์ AC/พาวเวอร์ซัพพลาย; อะแดปเตอร์กระสวย; ที่วางแกน; เท้าเหยียบ; อะแดปเตอร์แกนเสียบหลอดด้าย; แคลมป์ยึดโต๊ะ; ตัวนำด้าย; สาย USB; อื่นๆ
pl: Akcesoria do nawijarki elektrycznej w zestawie: Zasilacz sieciowy; Adaptery do szpulek; Uchwyt na stożek; Pedał nożny; Adaptery trzpienia szpulki; Zacisk stołowy; Prowadnik nici; Kabel USB; Inne
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικής διάταξης κουρδίσματος: Τροφοδοτικό/μετασχηματιστής AC; Αντάπτορας(ες) μασουριού; Βάση κώνου; Πεντάλ ποδιού; Αντάπτορας(ες) πείρου καρουλιού; Σφιγκτήρας τραπεζιού; Οδηγός νήματος; Καλώδιο USB; Άλλο
it: Accessori per avvolgitore elettrico inclusi: Adattatore CA/alimentatore; Adattatori per spolina; Portacono; Pedale; Adattatori per portarocchetto; Morsetto da tavolo; Guidafilo; Cavo USB; Altro
da: Tilbehør til elektrisk spole, der medfølger: AC-adapter/strømforsyning; Spoleadapter(e); Kegleholder; Fodpedal; Trådpindeadapter(e); Bordklemme; Trådfører; USB-kabel; Andet
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za električni navijalec: Napajalnik AC/električno napajanje; Adapter(ji) za vreteno; Držalo za stožce; Stopalka; Adapter(ji) za zatič tuljave; Mizna sponka; Vodilnik niti; Kabel USB; Drugo
fr: Accessoires fournis avec l’enrouleur électrique: Adaptateur secteur/bloc d’alimentation; Adaptateur(s) de canette; Porte-cône; Pédale; Adaptateur(s) de porte-bobine; Pince de table; Guide-fil; Câble USB; Autre
cs: Příslušenství k elektrickému navíječi, které je součástí balení: AC adaptér / napájecí zdroj; Adaptér(y) na cívky; Držák kužele; Nožní pedál; Adaptér(y) na trn cívky; Svorka na stůl; Vodič nitě; USB kabel; Jiné
lt-LT: Įtraukti elektrinio vyniotuvo aksesuarai: Kintamosios srovės adapteris / maitinimo šaltinis; Ritės adapteris (-iai); Kūgio laikiklis; Kojinis pedalas; Ritės strypelio adapteris (-iai); Stalo spaustukas; Siūlo kreiptuvas; USB kabelis; Kita
hu: Mellékelt elektromos tekercselő tartozékok: AC-adapter/tápegység; Orsóadapter(ek); Kúptartó; Lábpedál; Orsótartó tüske adapter(ek); Asztali rögzítőbilincs; Szálvezető; USB-kábel; Egyéb
nb: Tilbehør til elektrisk opptrekker inkludert: Strømadapter/strømforsyning; Spoleadapter(e); Kjegleholder; Fotpedal; Trådsnelleadapter(e); Bordklemme; Trådfører; USB-kabel; Annet
ru: Аксессуары в комплекте с электрической моталки: Адаптер переменного тока/блок питания; Адаптер(ы) для шпульки; Держатель для конуса; Ножная педаль; Адаптер(ы) для катушкодержателя; Настольный зажим; Нитеводитель; Кабель USB; Другое
zh-CN: 电动卷线器配套配件: 交流适配器/电源; 线轴适配器; 锥形线轴架; 脚踏板; 线轴销适配器; 台夹; 过线器; USB 数据线; 其他
vi: Phụ kiện máy cuốn dây điện đi kèm: Bộ đổi nguồn AC/bộ nguồn; Bộ chuyển đổi suốt chỉ; Giá đỡ cuộn chỉ; Bàn đạp; Bộ chuyển đổi chốt cuộn chỉ; Kẹp bàn; Thanh dẫn chỉ; Cáp USB; Khác
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für die elektrische Wickelmaschine: Netzteil/Stromversorgung; Spulenadapter; Konushalter; Fußpedal; Garnrollenhalter-Adapter; Tischklemme; Fadenführung; USB-Kabel; Sonstige
nl: Elektrische winder accessoires inbegrepen: AC-adapter/voeding; Spoeladapter(s); Klosjeshouder; Voetpedaal; Garenpenadapter(s); Tafelklem; Draadgeleider; USB-kabel; Overige
ko: 전동 와인더 포함 액세서리: AC 어댑터/전원 공급 장치; 보빈 어댑터; 콘 홀더; 풋 페달; 스풀 핀 어댑터; 테이블 클램프; 스레드 가이드; USB 케이블; 기타
zh-TW: 電動繞線器隨附配件: AC 變壓器/電源供應器; 線軸轉接器; 錐形筒架; 腳踏板; 線軸銷轉接器; 桌夾; 導線器; USB 連接線; 其他
hr-HR: Pribor za električni namotač uključen: Adapter izmjenične struje / napajanje; Adapter(i) za špulicu; Držač stošca; Nožna papučica; Adapter(i) za iglu kalema; Stolna stezaljka; Vodilica konca; USB kabel; Ostalo
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je príslušenstvo k elektrickému navíjaču: Sieťový adaptér/zdroj napájania; Adaptér(y) na cievku; Držiak kónusov; Nožný pedál; Adaptér(y) na kolík cievky; Stolová svorka; Vodič nite; Kábel USB; Iné
pt-BR: Acessórios para bobinadeira elétrica incluídos: Adaptador CA/fonte de alimentação; Adaptadores de bobina; Suporte de cone; Pedal; Adaptadores de pino de carretel; Grampo de mesa; Guia de fio; Cabo USB; Outro
pt-PT: Acessórios para enrolador elétrico incluídos: Adaptador de CA/fonte de alimentação; Adaptador(es) de bobina; Suporte de cone; Pedal; Adaptador(es) de suporte de carretos; Braçadeira de mesa; Guia de fio; Cabo USB; Outro
fi: Sähköisen puolaimen mukana toimitettavat lisävarusteet: Verkkolaite / virtalähde; Puolasovittimet; Kartiopidike; Jalkapoljin; Lankatappisovitin (-sovittimet); Pöytäkiinnike; Langanohjain; USB-kaapeli; Muu